Maryland, session 2025, SB0783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–311.
(A) A PRINCIPAL OR SCHOOL ADMINISTRATION SHALL INVESTIGATE EACH
STUDENT FIGHT OR PHYSICAL STRUGGLE.
(B) (1) A SCHOOL EMPLOYEE MAY NOT DISCIPLINE A STUDENT WHO,
AFTER THE INVESTIGATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION,
MORE LIKELY THAN NOT USED REASONABLE FORCE NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE
STUDENT OR TO ESCAPE THE ATTACK.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0783*

SENATE BILL 783
(2) IF A STUDENT WAS DISCIPLINED DURING THE COURSE OF THE
INVESTIGATION BUT WAS LATER DETERMINED TO HAVE USED REASONABLE FORCE
JUSTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PRINCIPAL OR
SCHOOL ADMINISTRATION SHALL EXPUNGE ANY DOCUMENTATION OF THE
DISCIPLINE FROM THE STUDENT’S DISCIPLINARY RECORD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.